Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 30.140 is amended to read:
30.140. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Architectural, engineering, photogrammetric  mapping, transportation planning or
land surveying services” has the meaning given that term in ORS 279C.100.
(b) “Construction agreement” means any written agreement for the planning,  design,
construction, alteration, repair, improvement or maintenance of any  building, highway, road
excavation or other structure, project, development  or improvement attached to real estate
including moving, demolition or tunneling in connection therewith.
(c) “Related services” has the meaning given that term in ORS 279C.100.
[(1)] (2) Except to the extent provided  under [ subsection (2) ] subsections (3) and (4)  of this
section, any provision in a  construction agreement that requires a person or that person’s surety
or insurer to indemnify another against liability for damage arising out of death or  bodily injury to
persons or damage to property caused in whole or in part by the negligence of the  indemnitee is
void.
[(2)] (3) This section does not affect any provision in a construction  agreement that requires a
person or that person’s surety or insurer to indemnify another against liability  for damage arising
out of death or bodily injury to persons or  damage to property to the extent that the death or bodily
injury to persons or damage to  property arises out of the fault of the indemnitor, or the fault of the
indemnitor’s agents, representatives or subcontractors.
(4) A public body as defined in ORS 174.109, including a public body acting as part of  an
intergovernmental entity formed with another state or  with a political subdivision of another
state, may not require in a contract with  a person or entity providing architectural, engi-
neering, photogrammetric mapping, transportation planning  or land surveying services or
related services a duty to defend the public body or intergovernmental entity against a  claim
for professional negligence and  relating to the professional services provided by the person
or entity providing architectural,  engineering, photogrammetric mapping, transportation
planning or land surveying  services or related services, except to the extent that the
person’s or entity’s liability or fault is  determined by adjudication or alternative dispute re-
solution or otherwise resolved by settlement agreement, and not to exceed the proportionate
Enrolled Senate Bill 1575 (SB 1575-A) Page 1
fault of the  person or entity. A contractual provision that violates this subsection is
unenforceable.
[(3) As used in this section, “construction agreement” means any written agreement  for the plan-
ning, design, construction, alteration, repair, improvement or maintenance of any building, highway,
road excavation or  other structure, project, development or improvement attached to real estate includ-
ing moving, demolition or tunneling in connection therewith. ]
[(4)] (5) This section does not apply to:
(a) Any real property lease or rental agreement  between a landlord and tenant whether or not
any provision of the lease or rental agreement relates to  or involves planning, design, construction,
alteration, repair, improvement or maintenance as long as the  predominant purpose of the lease or
rental agreement is not planning, design, construction, alteration, repair, improvement or mainte-
nance of real property; [ or]
(b) Any personal property lease or rental agreement ; or
(c) Any design-build contract .
[(5)] (6) No provision of this section shall be construed to apply to a “railroad” as defined in
ORS 824.200.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 30.140, as amended by section 1 of this 2024 Act, is amended to read:
30.140. (1) As used in this  section[ :], “construction agreement” means any written agree-
ment for the planning, design, construction,  alteration, repair, improvement or maintenance
of any building, highway, road excavation or other structure,  project, development or im-
provement attached to real estate including moving,  demolition or tunneling in connection
therewith.
[(a) “Architectural, engineering, photogrammetric mapping, transportation planning  or land sur-
veying services” has the meaning given that term in ORS 279C.100. ]
[(b) “Construction agreement” means any written agreement for the planning, design, construction,
alteration, repair, improvement or maintenance of any  building, highway, road excavation or other
structure, project, development or improvement attached to real  estate including moving, demolition or
tunneling in connection therewith. ]
[(c) “Related services” has the meaning given that term in ORS 279C.100. ]
(2) Except to the  extent provided under [ subsections (3) and (4) ] subsection (3)  of this section,
any provision in a construction agreement that requires a person or  that person’s surety or insurer
to indemnify another against liability for  damage arising out of death or bodily injury to persons
or damage to property caused in whole or in part by the negligence of the indemnitee is void.
(3) This section does not affect  any provision in a construction agreement that requires a person
or that person’s surety or  insurer to indemnify another against liability for damage arising out of
death or bodily injury to persons or  damage to property to the extent that the death or bodily injury
to persons or damage to property arises out of the fault of the indemnitor, or  the fault of the
indemnitor’s agents, representatives or subcontractors.
[(4) A public body as defined in ORS 174.109, including a public  body acting as part of an inter-
governmental entity formed with another state or with a political  subdivision of another state, may not
require in a contract  with a person or entity providing architectural, engineering, photogrammetric
mapping, transportation planning  or land surveying services or related services a duty to defend the
public body or intergovernmental entity against a claim for professional negligence and relating  to the
professional services provided by  the person or entity providing architectural, engineering, photogram-
metric mapping, transportation planning or land surveying services or related services,  except to the
extent that the person’s or entity’s liability or fault is determined by adjudication or  alternative dispute
resolution or otherwise resolved by  settlement agreement, and not to exceed the proportionate fault of
the person or entity. A contractual provision that violates this subsection is unenforceable. ]
[(5)] (4) This section does not apply to:
(a) Any real property lease or rental agreement  between a landlord and tenant whether or not
any provision of the lease or rental agreement relates to  or involves planning, design, construction,
alteration, repair, improvement or maintenance as long as the  predominant purpose of the lease or
Enrolled Senate Bill 1575 (SB 1575-A) Page 2
rental agreement is not planning, design, construction, alteration, repair, improvement or mainte-
nance of real property;  or
(b) Any personal property lease or rental agreement[ ; or ]
[(c) Any design-build contract ].
[(6)] (5) No provision of this section shall be construed to apply to a “railroad” as defined in
ORS 824.200.
SECTION 3.
(1) The amendments to ORS 30.140 by section 2 of this  2024 Act become op-
erative on January 1, 2035, and apply to  construction agreements and contracts entered into
or renewed on or after January 1, 2035.
(2) The  amendments to ORS 30.140 by section 1 of this 2024 Act apply to construction
agreements and contracts entered into or renewed on or after January 1, 2025, and on or
before December 31, 2034.
Passed by Senate February 26, 2024
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House March 7, 2024
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1575 (SB 1575-A) Page 3